Missouri, session 2026, HB2915.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 547, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 547.033, to read as follows:
547.033. Any person in the custody of, or under the supervision of, the
department of corrections may raise a claim of actual innocence in a postconviction
action or proceeding challenging the validity of the original judgment or sentence. The
court shall have the authority to review, decide, and issue an order on such a claim if the
court finds that there is clear and convincing evidence supporting the claim of actual
innocence and that such evidence undermines confidence in the correctness of the
judgment. In considering a claim of actual innocence, the court shall evaluate all
relevant evidence including, but not limited to, evidence not presented to the original
trier of fact at trial, during plea hearings, or at other proceedings. A claim of actual
innocence may be supported by newly discovered or newly available evidence. The
court may dismiss the claim without a hearing if the court determines that the petitioner
has failed to make a prima facie showing of actual innocence. If the court determines,
based on the totality of the evidence, that the burden of proof has been met by clear and
convincing evidence and that such evidence undermines confidence in the original
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2915 2
judgment, the court shall vacate or set aside the judgment and shall issue written
findings of fact and conclusions of law identifying the evidence relied upon.
✔